Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.070

Legislators to receive codes and supplements on digital media without charge.

Each member of the legislature may receive one set of the Revised Code of Washington on digital media without charge. All persons receiving codes under this section may receive supplements to the code on digital media free of charge, during their term of office as a member or officer of the legislature.

[ 2011 c 156 s 2; 1955 c 235 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Finding—Intent—2011 c 156: See note following RCW 1.08.080.